Mississippi, session 2026, SB2753.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 17-15-1, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 17-15-1.  (1)  The boards of supervisors and the municipal governing boards of the various counties and cities of the State of Mississippi are hereby empowered to create human resource agencies which may be comprised of one or more counties, cities, or any combination thereof.  It is the express intention of this chapter that agencies created hereunder shall be operated under local governmental control and shall be responsible for administration of programs heretofore conducted by community action agencies, limited purpose agencies and related programs authorized by federal law. (2)  (a)  Any human resource agency created pursuant to this chapter shall publicly disclose the statutory authority under which it was created, including citation to the specific section or sections of the Mississippi Code of 1972 authorizing its formation. (b)  Such disclosure shall be displayed in a clear and conspicuous manner on the agency's publicly accessible website, if any, and on official publications, reports, or other forward-facing materials distributed to the public. (3)  (a)  For purposes of the Mississippi Tort Claims Act, Section 11-46-1 et seq., Mississippi Code of 1972, notice of claim against an agency created pursuant to this chapter shall not be served upon an officer, employee or executive director of the agency. (b)  If the agency was created or appointed by a county or counties, notice shall be served upon the chancery clerk of the county in which the principal offices of the agency are located. (c)  If the agency was created or appointed by a municipality or municipalities, notice shall be served upon the municipal clerk of the appointing municipality. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.